Florida, session 2026, SB1320.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 10 11 Section 1.âSection 17.326, Florida Statutes, is created to 12 read: 13 17.326âLocal government spending analysis.â 14 (1)âAs used in this section, the term âlocal government 15 spending analysisâ means a statement prepared by the department, 16 or an agency thereof, analyzing the spending of a county 17 government. 18 (2)âIf a local government spending analysis has been 19 prepared, such analysis must be included on any referendum 20 proposing an increase in taxes levied by a county. 21 (3)âThe department may adopt rules to implement this 22 section, including standards and requirements for a local 23 government spending analysis. 24 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.